Utah statutes.
11-46-203.   Animal shelters to transfer only sterilized animals, or shall require sterilization deposit.

(1)  An animal shelter may not transfer an animal that has not been sterilized, except as provided in Subsection (2) or Section 11-46-206.

(2)  An animal shelter may transfer an animal for adoption that has not been sterilized only if the animal shelter:

(a)  establishes a written agreement, executed by the recipient, stating the animal is not sterilized and the recipient agrees in writing to be responsible for ensuring the animal is sterilized:

(i)  within 30 days after the agreement is signed, if the animal is six months of age or older; or

(ii)  if the animal is younger than six months of age, within 30 days after the animal becomes six months of age; and

(b)  receives from the recipient a sterilization deposit as provided under Section 11-46-204, the terms of which are part of the written agreement executed by the recipient in accordance with this section.

(3)  The shelter may waive the sterilization deposit and release any unsterilized animal to a sponsor, as defined in Section 11-46-302, provided the sponsor is a non-profit organization that qualifies as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and provides proof of sterilization within 30 days.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

